Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1740
Disclosure document; contain unexecuted copy of marketing plan contract.

The disclosure document required by section 59-1732 shall contain an unexecuted copy of the entire seller-assisted marketing plan contract.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 40;

Laws 1983, LB 461, § 9.